serbian_phon.twol
Alphabet

    ! base alphabet
    A B C Č Ć D Đ E F G H I J K L Lj M N Nj O P R S Š T U V Z Ž
    a b c č ć d đ e f g h i j k l lj m n nj o p r s š t u v z ž

    ! archiphonemes
    %{oe%}:o
    %{Lzero%}:0
    %{g2z%}:g
    %{h2s%}:h
    %{k2c%}:k
    %{ghkTriggerI%}:i
    %{vocMasc%}:e

; ! end Alphabet


Sets

    Soft = C Č Ć Đ J Lj Nj Š Ž
           c č ć đ j lj nj š ž ;
    
    Vowel = A E I O U
            a e i o u ;


Rules

"if o/e is preceeded by a soft consonant, its surface form is 'e' (default is 'o')"
%{oe%}:e <=> :Soft _ ;

"if l/zero is followed by a vowel, its surface form is 'l' (default is zero)"
%{Lzero%}:l <=> _ :Vowel ;

! g,h,k -> z,s,c when followed by 'i'
"if g/z is followed by a trigger i, its surface form is 'z' (default is 'g')"
%{g2z%}:z <=> _ %{ghkTriggerI%}: ;
"if h/s is followed by a trigger i, its surface form is 's' (default is 'h')"
%{h2s%}:s <=> _ %{ghkTriggerI%}: ;
"if k/c is followed by a trigger i, its surface form is 'c' (default is 'k')"
%{k2c%}:c <=> _ %{ghkTriggerI%}: ;

! masculine singular vocative ending
"if the last consonant is soft, the vocative ending is 'u' (default is 'e')"
%{vocMasc%}:u <=> :Soft _ ;
"if the last consonant is an 'h', the vocative ending is 'u' (default is 'e')"
%{vocMasc%}:u <=> :h _ ;
